Mississippi, session 2026, HB1272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-3-502, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-3-502.  (1)  For the purposes of this section: (a)  "Motor vehicle" has the meaning ascribed in Section 27-19-3. (b) "Motorcycle" has the meaning ascribed in Section 27-19-3. (c)  "Street" or "highway" means the entire width between property lines of every way or place of whatever nature when any part thereof is open to the use of the public, as a matter of right, for purposes of vehicular traffic. (2)  Any person driving a motor vehicle or motorcycle upon a street or highway in a race, upon conviction, shall be punished as follows: (a)  A person convicted for the first offense of violating this subsection shall be fined not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), imprisoned for not more than forty-eight (48) hours, or both. (b)  For a second conviction of any person violating this subsection, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, the person shall be fined not less than Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) nor more than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), shall be imprisoned not less than five (5) days nor more than one (1) year, and shall be sentenced to community service work for not less than ten (10) days nor more than one (1) year. (c)  (i)  For a third or subsequent conviction of any person violating this subsection, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, the person shall be guilty of a felony and fined not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), and shall serve not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years in the custody of the Department of Corrections; however, for any such offense that does not result in serious injury or death to any person, the sentence of incarceration may be served in the county jail at the discretion of the circuit court judge. (ii)  After a conviction under this subsection and upon receipt of the court abstract, the Commissioner of Public Safety shall suspend the driver's license and driving privileges of the person for not less than five (5) years. (d)  In addition to the penalties described in this subsection (2) for violation of this section, any vehicle used in violation of this section shall be forfeited to the law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred and sold in the manner provided by law for property forfeited to a law enforcement agency.  The provisions of this paragraph (d) shall only be applicable in municipalities, counties or towns with a population of twenty-five thousand (25,000) or more. (3)  A conviction and imposition of a sentence under this section does not prevent a conviction and imposition of a sentence under Section 63-7-103. SECTION 2.  Section 63-3-1215, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-3-1215.  (1)  No person shall drive any vehicle upon the public roads in this state in any race, speed competition or contest, drag race or acceleration contest, test of physical endurance, exhibition of speed or acceleration, or for the purpose of making a speed record, and no person shall in any manner participate in any such race, speed competition, drag race, test * * *or of physical endurance, exhibition, or purpose of making a speed record. (2)  For the purposes of this section, "drag race" means the operation of two (2) or more vehicles from a point side by side at accelerating speeds in a competitive attempt to outdistance each other, or the operation of one or more vehicles over a common selected course, from the same point to the same point, for the purpose of comparing the relative speeds or power of acceleration of such vehicle or vehicles within a certain distance or time limit on the public roads of this state. (3)  For the purposes of this section, "racing" means the use of one or more vehicles in an attempt to outgain, outdistance, or prevent another vehicle from passing, or to test the physical stamina or endurance of drivers over long-distance driving routes on the public roads of this state. (4)  Any person convicted of violating this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or both.  In addition the penalties provided in this subsection (4), any vehicle used in violation of this subsection shall be forfeiture to the law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred and sold in the manner provided by law for property forfeited to a law enforcement agency. (5)  The prohibitions contained in this section do not apply to events sanctioned by local governing authorities. SECTION 3.  Section 63-7-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-7-103.  (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Trooper Steve Hood Act:  The Nitrous Oxide Prohibition Act." (2)  For the purposes of this section: (a)  "Motor vehicle" has the meaning ascribed in Section 27-19-3; however, the term "motor vehicle" does not include any vehicle with a gross vehicle or combination weight greater than ten thousand (10,000) pounds. (b) "Motorcycle" has the meaning ascribed in Section 27-19-3. (c)  "Nitrous oxide" means a gas or liquid form of nitrous oxide that is used to increase the speed or performance of a motor vehicle or motorcycle. (d)  "Street" or "highway" means the entire width between property lines of every way or place of whatever nature when any part thereof is open to the use of the public, as a matter of right, for purposes of vehicular traffic. (3)  (a)  (i)  A person shall not operate on a street or highway a motor vehicle or motorcycle that is equipped to supply the engine with nitrous oxide unless the nitrous oxide supply system is made inoperative by means of disconnecting the nitrous oxide feed line from the engine or removing the nitrous oxide canister from the motor vehicle or motorcycle. (ii)  No fine or imprisonment shall be imposed against the operator for a violation of this section, unless at the time the operator was charged with a violation of this section he also was charged with some other offense under Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, and he is convicted of both offenses. (b)  A person convicted for the first offense of violating this subsection shall be fined not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), imprisoned for not more than forty-eight (48) hours, or both. (c)  For a second conviction of any person violating this subsection, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, the person shall be fined not less than Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) nor more than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), shall be imprisoned not less than five (5) days nor more than one (1) year, and shall be sentenced to community service work for not less than ten (10) days nor more than one (1) year. (d)  (i)  For a third or subsequent conviction of any person violating this subsection, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, the person shall be guilty of a felony and fined not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), and shall serve not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years in the custody of the Department of Corrections; however, for any such offense that does not result in serious injury or death to any person, the sentence of incarceration may be served in the county jail at the discretion of the circuit court judge. (ii)  After a conviction under this subsection and upon receipt of the court abstract, the Commissioner of Public Safety shall suspend the driver's license and driving privileges of the person for not less than five (5) years. (iii)  After a conviction under this subsection, the law enforcement agency shall seize the vehicle owned by any person convicted of a third or subsequent violation of this subsection, if the convicted person was driving the vehicle at the time the offense was committed.  The vehicle may be forfeited in the manner provided by Sections 63-11-49 through 63-11-53. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.